Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2701
Fines, costs, forfeited recognizances; to whom paid.

All money due upon any judgment for fines, costs, or forfeited recognizances shall be paid to the judge or clerk of the court where the judgment is pending, if paid before execution is issued therefor, otherwise to the officer holding the execution, or such money may be paid to the sheriff of the county if the judgment debtor is in jail. Every sheriff, marshal, or other ministerial officer who shall receive any such money shall pay the same to the proper clerk of the court within ten days from the time of receiving the same.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 533, p. 840;

R.S.1913, § 9237;

C.S.1922, § 10266;

C.S.1929, § 29-2701;

R.S.1943, § 29-2701;

Laws 1973, LB 226, § 18;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 28.

Fines and penalties collected by clerk of the district court are public money. State ex rel. Broatch v. Moores, 52 Neb. 770, 73 N.W. 299 (1897).